Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 5. Business Development Corporations
[Repealed]

§§79-5-1 through79-5-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2006, ch. 377, § 1 effective from and after July 1, 2006.

§79-5-1. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-3. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-5. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-7. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 278, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).]

§79-5-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-07; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-08; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-09; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-10; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 10; Laws, 1970, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 19, 1970).]

§79-5-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-11; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-12; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-13; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-14; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-29. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-15; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 15; Laws, 1968, ch. 279, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 10, 1968).]

§79-5-31. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-16; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

§79-5-33. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-17; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 17; Laws, 1968, ch. 279, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved July 10, 1968).]

§79-5-35. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-18; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 18; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved September 8, 1969).]

§79-5-37. [Codes, 1942, § 5390-19; Laws, 1960, ch. 186, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).]

Former § 79-5-1 was entitled “Short Title.”

Former § 79-5-3 was entitled “Definitions.”

Former § 79-5-5 was entitled “Incorporation; commencement of operations.”

Former § 79-5-7 was entitled “Purposes.”

Former § 79-5-9 was entitled “Powers.”

Former § 79-5-11 was entitled “Charter of incorporation; capital stock.”

Former § 79-5-13 was entitled “Authority conferred on existing and future corporations; who may deal in bonds and securities of corporation.”

Former § 79-5-15 was entitled “Financial institutions may become members; loans to corporations; limits; evidences of indebtedness; interest.”

Former § 79-5-17 was entitled “Duration of membership; withdrawal; calls for loans subsequent to withdrawal.”

Former § 79-5-19 was entitled “Management and control of corporation; board of directors; board of members; executive committee; elections, terms and qualifications; liability for losses.”

Former § 79-5-21 was entitled “Powers of stockholders; voting and meetings of stockholders and members; number of votes; dissolution.”

Former § 79-5-23 was entitled “Amendment of charter; approval and filing of amendments.”

Former § 79-5-25 was entitled “Earned surplus.”

Former § 79-5-27 was entitled “Designation of depository; corporation may not receive deposits.”

Former § 79-5-29 was entitled “Audits; reports.”

Former § 79-5-31 was entitled “First meeting of corporation; notice; minutes; business that may be transacted; quorum.”

Former § 79-5-33 was entitled “Securities of corporation subject to Mississippi Securities Law; sale of securities of previously chartered corporations regulated; legal investments.”

Former § 79-5-35 was entitled “Effect of failure to begin business.”

Former § 79-5-37 was entitled “Credit of state.”